Maryland, session 2025, SB0911.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – Property
7–207.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Blind individual” means an individual who has a permanent
impairment of both eyes that causes:
(i) central visual acuity, with corrective glasses, of 20/200 or less in
the better eye; or
(ii) central visual acuity of more than 20/200 if there is a field defect
in which the peripheral field has contracted so that the widest diameter of visual field
subtends an angular distance no greater than 20 degrees in the better eye.
(3) “Dwelling house”:
(i) means real property that is:
1. the legal residence of a blind individual or a surviving
spouse; and
2. occupied by not more than 2 families; and
– 1 –

Ch. 285 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) includes the lot or curtilage, and structures necessary to use the
real property as a residence.
(4) “Surviving spouse” means the surviving spouse of a blind individual, if
the surviving spouse has not remarried.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (d) of this section, a dwelling house is exempt
from property tax to the extent of [$15,000] $40,000 of its assessment if the dwelling house
is owned by:
(1) a blind individual; or
(2) a surviving spouse.
(c) Except as provided in subsection (d) of this section, after a blind individual
dies, the surviving spouse shall receive an exemption under this section, if the dwelling
house was formerly exempt under this section.
(d) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, an exemption
under this section shall be granted in addition to any other exemption authorized by law.
(2) An individual may receive an exemption under this section or under §
7–208 of this subtitle but not under both.
(e) An exemption under this section shall be prorated by the supervisor for any
part of a taxable year that remains after the date in the year when the blind individual or
surviving spouse applies for the exemption.
(f) (1) The governing body of a county or a municipal corporation may
authorize, by law, a refund to a blind individual who receives an exemption under this
section for any county or municipal corporation property tax paid in the taxable years in
which an exemption was authorized but not granted.
(2) A county or municipal corporation may not authorize a refund for a
surviving spouse.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after June 30, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 2 –